Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.060

Delegation of powers, duties, and functions—Director's responsibilities.

The director may delegate the performance of such powers, duties, and functions, other than those relating to rule making, to employees of the department, but the director shall remain and be responsible for the official acts of the employees of the department.

The director shall be responsible for the public employees' retirement system, the teachers' retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, the judicial retirement system, the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system, the public safety employees' retirement system, and the Washington state patrol retirement system. The director shall also be responsible for the deferred compensation program.

[ 2004 c 242 s 43; 1998 c 341 s 502; 1995 c 239 s 318; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.